Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 6

Nonresident Seller's Permits

57-3-601. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Nonresident Liquor Seller's Permit Act of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 1.

57-3-602. When permit required — Exceptions.

A nonresident seller's permit is required of any manufacturer, distillery, winery, importer, broker, or person which sells or distributes alcoholic beverages to any wholesaler licensed under § 57-3-203 or any manufacturer licensed under § 57-3-202, regardless of whether the sale is consummated inside or outside Tennessee. No such permit is required if such manufacturer, distillery or winery is operating pursuant to § 57-2-104, § 57-3-202, § 57-3-203 or § 57-3-207.

A nonresident seller's permit is also required of any importer, broker, or other entity that imports alcoholic beverages into this state for the purpose of the following:

Warehousing wine and other alcoholic beverage in the state for the purpose of sale to entities legally authorized to purchase such wine and alcoholic beverages outside this state;

Selling wines which are not registered pursuant to § 57-3-301 and which are not capable of being registered in that no qualified manufacturer, winery or distiller exists to approve such registration; provided, that such sales within the state shall be permitted only to wholesalers licensed pursuant to § 57-3-203; and

Selling wines which are registered pursuant to § 57-3-301 but as to which vintages are not available from the manufacturer, winery, or distiller, but such sales shall be permitted only to those wholesalers authorized to distribute such wines by the manufacturer, winery, or distiller as identified on the registration records of the department of revenue.

A nonresident seller licensed under this subsection (b) is not subject to § 57-3-607.

A non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit is required of any entity that is engaged in marketing, licensing of trademark or trade name, or contracting for the manufacture of any wine, distilled spirit or other alcoholic beverage, where such entity is not directly engaged in the manufacturing, bottling, distilling, blending of such wine, spirit or alcoholic beverage, and is not the holder of a basic permit issued by the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of the treasury as a brewery, distilled spirits plant, or winery. A non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit under this part may be issued by the commission irrespective of the residence of the entity.

The holder of a non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit issued under subdivision (c)(1) shall be authorized to market, facilitate the sale of, possess intellectual property rights relating to, or cause to be distributed any wine, distilled spirit or other alcoholic beverage to wholesalers licensed pursuant to § 57-3-203.

The holder of a non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit may contract with distillers, wineries, and other manufacturers to produce, rectify, bottle or manufacture wine or distilled spirits on its behalf, may ship or cause to be shipped into or within this state alcoholic beverages as an element of sales made to wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203 and may contract with wholesalers to purchase such products.

Non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit holders may take title of and store in this state alcoholic beverages and wine from a distiller or winery to which it holds marketing, licensing or trademark rights only if the non-manufacturer non-resident seller's permit holder possesses a basic permit from the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of the treasury, has paid an additional annual fee of three thousand dollars ($3,000) to the commission, and is storing such alcoholic beverages or wine in a location approved by the commission for storage of untaxed alcoholic beverages or wine. The department of revenue may require the posting of a bond for such storage.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 2; 2011, ch. 448, §§ 1, 6; 2014, ch. 767, § 1; 2015, ch. 269, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Section 57-3-608, formerly referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 968, § 4, effective May 10, 2012; therefore, the reference was deleted from the section by authority of the code commission in 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. A foreign corporation or limited liability company licensed as a nonresident seller or direct shipper must obtain a certificate of authority from the Tennessee secretary of state only if the corporation or company transacts business in the state within the meaning of the relevant statutes, which depends on the character and extent of the corporation’s or the company’s transactions and business in the state. OAG 18-28, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (7/6/2018).

57-3-603. Authorized transactions.

Except as otherwise provided in §57-3-602(c), the holder of a nonresident seller's permit is authorized to:

Solicit and take orders for alcoholic beverages from wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203; and

Ship or cause to be shipped into this state alcoholic beverages in consummation of sales made to wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 3; 2014, ch. 767, § 2.

57-3-604. Prohibited actions.

No holder of a nonresident seller's permit, nor any officer, director, agent, or employee of the holder, nor any affiliate of the holder, regardless of whether the affiliation is corporate or by management, direction, or control, may do any of the following:

Have an interest, direct, or indirect in any business licensed under §§ 57-3-204 and 57-4-101;

Fail to make or file a report with the commission as required by rule of the commission;

Sell liquor for resale inside this state that fails to meet the standards of quality, purity, and identity prescribed by the commission;

Advertise any liquor contrary to the laws of this state or to the rules of the commission, or sell liquor for resale in this state in violation of advertising or labeling rules of the commission;

Sell liquor for resale inside this state or cause it to be brought into the state in a size of container prohibited by this code or by rule of the commission;

Solicit or take orders for liquor from a person not authorized to import liquor into this state for the purpose of resale;

Induce, persuade, or influence, or attempt to induce, persuade or influence, a person to violate this code or a rule of the commission, or conspire with a person to violate this code or a rule of the commission; or

Exercise a privilege granted by a nonresident seller's permit while an order or suspension against the permit is in effect.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 4; 2012, ch. 968, § 2.

57-3-605. Application for permit — Annual fee — Expiration date — Verified statement.

Any manufacturer, distillery, winery, importer or other person desiring to obtain a nonresident seller's permit may make application for such to the commission on forms provided by the commission.

In addition, every applicant shall pay to the commission an annual permit fee which is established at one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) if such applicant shall have shipped, sold or otherwise distributed fewer than one hundred (100) cases of any alcoholic beverage in this state in the year immediately preceding application. If such applicant shall have shipped, sold or otherwise distributed one hundred (100) cases or more of any alcoholic beverage in this state in the year immediately preceding application, it shall pay an annual permit fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the commission.

Each permit shall be valid for one (1) calendar year.

Any wholesaler, holding a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-203, shall be authorized to act as an importer of alcoholic beverages and wine if such wholesaler holds a basic permit issued pursuant to the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), as an importer, advises the commission of its intent to act as an importer, pays an additional annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the commission and otherwise complies with the obligations of an importer pursuant to § 57-3-301 and title 47, chapter 25, part 15.

Every applicant which has registered to import wine into this state shall provide to the commission a verified statement that neither such applicant, nor any agent or affiliate of such applicant, has a policy which would permit the selling, shipment or distribution of alcoholic beverages to any person in this state not possessed of a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-203, and that, for the previous year, neither such applicant nor any agent or affiliate of such applicant has sold, solicited for sale or distributed any alcoholic beverages to any person or enterprise in this state not possessing a license issued pursuant to § 57-3-203.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 5; 1991, ch. 23, § 1; 2004, ch. 876, § 4; 2011, ch. 448, § 3.

57-3-606. Wholesalers to import from nonresident seller permittees only.

No wholesaler licensed under §57-3-203 may purchase or order any alcoholic beverage for importation into the state from any source other than one possessed of a nonresident seller's permit or a wholesaler licensed pursuant to §57-3-203 holding a basic permit under the Federal Alcohol Administration Act (27 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), as an importer. No such wholesaler may purchase or order any alcoholic beverage for importation into the state from any permittee whose permit has been revoked or suspended after such wholesaler has received notice of the revocation or suspension. Notwithstanding §57-1-201(b)(1)(A), no administrative action, including the imposition of any fine, may be brought against a wholesaler under this section unless, prior to bringing the action, the commission has provided written notice to the wholesaler advising the wholesaler that the supplier's nonresident seller's permit has been revoked, suspended, or not renewed.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 6; 2011, ch. 448, § 2; 2016, ch. 898, § 3.

57-3-607. Nonresident seller to be primary American source of supply.

No holder of a nonresident seller's permit may solicit, accept, or fill an order for distilled spirits or wine from a holder of any type of wholesaler's permit unless the nonresident seller is the primary American source of supply for the brand of distilled spirits or wine that is ordered.

In this section, “primary American source of supply” means the distiller, the producer, the owner of the commodity at the time it becomes a marketable product, the bottler, or the exclusive agent of any of those. To be the “primary American source of supply” the nonresident seller must be the first source, that is, the manufacturer or the source closest to the manufacturer, in the channel of commerce from whom the product can be secured by American wholesalers.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 7.

57-3-608. [Reserved.]

If a representative of the commission or the department of revenue wishes to examine the books, accounts, records, minutes, letters, memoranda, documents, checks, telegrams, constitution and bylaws, or other records of a nonresident seller's permittee, the representative shall make a written request to the permittee or the permittee's duly authorized manager or representative or, if the permittee is a corporation, to any officer of the corporation.

When a request for an examination is made, the person to whom it is directed shall immediately allow the representative to conduct the examination.

The representative may investigate the organization, conduct, and management of any nonresident seller's permittee and may make copies of any records which in the judgment of the representative may show or tend to show that the permittee has violated state law, regulation or the terms of the permit.

A representative may not make public any information obtained under this section except to a law enforcement officer of this state or in connection with an administrative or judicial proceeding in which the state or commission is a party concerning the cancellation or suspension of a nonresident seller's permit, the collection of taxes due under state law, or the violation of state law.

The commission may revoke or suspend a nonresident seller's permit in accordance with this title if a permittee or the permittee's authorized representative fails or refuses to permit an examination authorized by this section, or to permit the making of copies of any documents as provided by this section, without regard to whether the document is inside or outside the state, or if the permittee or the permittee's authorized representative fails or refuses to answer a question of an officer incident to an examination or investigation in progress.

Acts 1981, ch. 157, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. A minor may be used to purchase beer as part of an investigation by a local beer board so long as written approval of the minor's parents and the juvenile court is obtained, OAG 01-062 (4/20/01).